North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 4. Compensation for Killing Diseased Animals.

§ 106-323.
State to pay part of value of animals killed on account of disease; purchase by State of animals exposed to certain diseases.

If it appears to be necessary for the control or eradication of Bang’s disease and tuberculosis and paratuberculosis in cattle, or glanders in horses and mules, to destroy such animals affected with such diseases and to compensate owners for loss thereof, the State Veterinarian is authorized, within his discretion, to agree on the part of the State, in the case of cattle destroyed for Bang’s disease and tuberculosis, and paratuberculosis to pay one third of the difference between the appraised value of each animal so destroyed and the value of the salvage thereof: Provided, that in no case shall any payment by the State be more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for any grade animal nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for any purebred animal; provided further, that the State indemnity shall not be in excess of the indemnity payments made by the federal government. In the case of horses or mules destroyed for glanders, to pay one half of the appraised value, said half not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00).

The State Veterinarian is also authorized, in his discretion, and subject to the maximum payment hereinabove provided, to purchase in the name of the State, cattle which have been exposed to Bang’s disease, tuberculosis or paratuberculosis and horses and mules which have been exposed to glanders.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 1; C.S., s. 4882; 1929, c. 107; 1939, c. 272, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 525, s. 3; 1973, c. 1122.

Cross References.

As to indemnity for swine destroyed on account of being affected by hog cholera, see

G.S. 106-322.2

.

As to provision that failure to kill animal affected with glanders constitutes a misdemeanor, see

G.S. 106-404

.

§ 106-324.
Appraisal of cattle affected with Bang’s disease and tuberculosis.

Cattle affected with Bang’s disease and tuberculosis and paratuberculosis shall be appraised by three men — one to be chosen by the owner, one by the United States Bureau of Animal Industry, and one by the State Veterinarian. If the United States Bureau of Animal Industry is not represented, then the appraisers shall be chosen, one by the owner, one by the State Veterinarian, the third by the first two named. The finding of such appraisers shall be final.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 2; C.S., s. 4883; 1929, c. 107; 1939, c. 272, s. 1.

§ 106-325.
Appraisal of animals affected with glanders; report.

Animals affected with glanders shall be appraised by three men — one to be chosen by the owner, one to be chosen by the State Veterinarian, the third to be named by the first two chosen, the finding of such appraisers to be final. The report of appraisal to be made in triplicate on forms furnished by the State Veterinarian, and a copy sent to the State Veterinarian at once.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 3; C.S., s. 4884.

§ 106-326.
Report of appraisal of cattle affected with Bang’s disease and tuberculosis to State Veterinarian; contents.

Appraisals of cattle affected with Bang’s disease or tuberculosis shall be reported on forms furnished by the State Veterinarian, which shall show the number of animals, the appraised value of each per head, or the weight and appraised value per pound, and shall be signed by the owners and the appraisers. This report must be made in triplicate and a copy sent to the State Veterinarian: Provided, that the State Veterinarian may change the forms for making claims so as to conform to the claim forms used by the United States Department of Agriculture.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 4; C.S., s. 4885; 1939, c. 272, ss. 1, 3.

§ 106-327.
Marketing of cattle affected with Bang’s disease and tuberculosis.

Each owner of cattle affected with Bang’s disease or tuberculosis, which have been appraised, and which have been authorized by the State Veterinarian to be marketed, shall market the cattle within 30 days and shall obtain from the purchaser a report in triplicate. One copy to be sent by the State Veterinarian at once, certifying as to the amount of money actually paid for the animals, all animals to be identified on report.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 5; C.S., s. 4886; 1939, c. 272, s. 1.

§ 106-328.
Report on salvage.

When the appraised cattle have been slaughtered and the amount of salvage ascertained, a report, on forms furnished by the State Veterinarian, in triplicate shall be made, signed by the owner and the United States Bureau of Animal Industry or State inspector and the appraisers by which the animals were appraised and destroyed, showing the difference between the appraised value and salvage. Two copies are to be attached to the voucher in which compensation is claimed, and one copy to be furnished by the owner of cattle.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 6; C.S., s. 4887.

§ 106-329.
Compensation when killing ordered.

Compensation for animals destroyed on account of glanders will only be paid when such destruction is ordered by the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative. When the owner of the animals presents his claim he shall support same with the original report of the appraiser, together with the report of the inspector who destroyed the animal, to the State Veterinarian.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 7; C.S., s. 4888.

§ 106-330.
Ownership of destroyed animals; outstanding liens.

When animals have been destroyed pursuant to this Article the inspector shall take reasonable precautions to determine, prior to his approval of vouchers in which compensation is claimed, who is the owner of and whether there are any mortgages or other liens outstanding against the animals. If it appears that there are outstanding liens, a full report regarding same shall be made and shall accompany the voucher. Every such report shall include a description of the liens, the name of the person or persons having possession of the documentary evidence, and a statement showing what arrangements, if any, have been made to discharge the liens outstanding against the animals destroyed of which the inspector may have knowledge.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 8; C.S., s. 4889.

§ 106-331.
State not to pay for feed of animals ordered killed.

Expense for the care and feeding of animals held for slaughter shall not be paid by the State.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 9; C.S., s. 4890.

§ 106-332.
Disinfection of stockyards by owners.

Stockyards, pens, cars, vessels and other premises and conveyances will be disinfected whenever necessary for the control and eradication of disease by the owners at their expense under the supervision of an inspector of the United States Bureau of Animal Industry or State Veterinarian.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 10; C.S., s. 4891.

§ 106-333.
Payments made only on certain conditions.

No payments shall be made for any animal slaughtered in the following cases:

If the owner does not disinfect premises, etc., as directed by an inspector of the United States Bureau of Animal Industry or the State Veterinarian.

For any animals destroyed where the owner has not complied with all lawful quarantine regulations.

Animals reacting to a test not approved by the State Veterinarian.

Animals belonging to the United States.

Animals brought into the State in violation of the State laws and regulations.

Animals which the owner or claimant knew to be diseased, or had notice thereof, at the time they came into his possession.

Animals which had the disease for which they were slaughtered or which were destroyed by reason of exposure to the disease, at the time of their arrival in the State.

Animals which have not been within the State of North Carolina for at least 120 days prior to the discovery of the disease.

Where owner does not use reasonable care in protecting animals from disease.

Where owner has failed to submit the necessary reports as required by this Article.

Any unregistered bull.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 11; C.S., s. 4892; 1939, c. 272, s. 4.

§ 106-334.
Owner’s claim for indemnity supported by reports.

The owner must present his claim for indemnity to the State Veterinarian for approval, and the claim shall be supported with the original report of the appraisers, the original report of the sale of the animals in the case of cattle destroyed on account of Bang’s disease and tuberculosis, the certificate of the State or United States Bureau of Animal Industry inspector, and a summary of the claim. All of which shall constitute a part of the claim.

The owner must state whether or not the animals are owned entirely by him or advise fully of any partnership, and describe fully any mortgages or other liens against animals.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 12; C.S., s. 4893; 1939, c. 272, s. 1.

§ 106-335.
State Veterinarian to carry out provisions of Article; how moneys paid out.

The State Veterinarian is authorized, himself or by his representative, to do all things specified in this Article. All moneys authorized to be paid shall be paid from the State treasury and the State Treasurer is hereby authorized to make such payment.

History.

1919, c. 62, s. 13; C.S., s. 4894; 1983, c. 913, s. 13.